Idaho, session 2026, H0743.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 7, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 17, Title 7, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 17
ACTION TO ENFORCE THE LAW
7-1701. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employee" means a person employed by a public entity or pub-
lic officer.
(2) "Public entity" means:
(a) Any agency, board, bureau, department, division, institution, or
office of the state;
(b) Any public school, public charter school, or school district in the
state;
(c) Any independent public body corporate and politic in the state;
(d) Any political subdivision of the state; or
(e) Any other public organization created by the Idaho constitution or
an Idaho statute.
(3) "Public officer" means a person elected or appointed to an office
created by the Idaho constitution or an Idaho statute.
7-1702. ACTION TO ENFORCE THE LAW. (1) The attorney general may file an
action to enforce the law against a public officer, public employee, or pub-
lic entity when the attorney general has reason to believe that such officer,
employee, or entity:
(a) Failed to perform a duty assigned to the officer, employee, or en-
tity by law; or
(b) Violated a prohibition imposed on the officer, employee, or entity
by law.
(2) The action authorized by this section may be filed only if the law
that the attorney general seeks to enforce does not establish a penalty for
noncompliance or another enforcement mechanism.
7-1703. ORDER TO COMPLY -- ATTORNEY'S FEES. (1) In an action filed pur-
suant to this chapter, a court of competent jurisdiction shall issue an order


to comply with the law if the attorney general proves by a preponderance of
the evidence that a public officer, public employee, or public entity:
(a) Failed to perform a duty assigned to the officer, employee, or en-
tity by law; or
(b) Violated a prohibition imposed on the officer, employee, or entity
by law.
(2) A person who fails to comply with an order issued pursuant to this
section shall be guilty of contempt and subject to punishment as provided by
law.
(3) The attorney general shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's
fees in any successful action filed pursuant to this chapter.
7-1704. CIVIL PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THE LAW. (1) In an
action filed pursuant to this chapter, a court of competent jurisdiction
may hold a public officer or public employee personally liable for a civil
penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) if the officer's or em-
ployee's failure to comply with the law was willful.
(2) Penalties paid pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the
state general fund.
7-1705. WITHHOLDING OF REVENUE-SHARING ACCOUNT INSTALLMENTS. After
filing an action pursuant to this chapter against a city or county, the at-
torney general shall order that any installments scheduled to be paid to
the city or county from the revenue-sharing account established in section
63-3638(10), Idaho Code, be withheld until the action is resolved in a court
of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that the city or county failed
to comply with the law, the withheld moneys shall be distributed to the tax
relief fund established in section 57-811, Idaho Code. If the court finds
that the city or county complied with the law, the withheld moneys shall be
distributed to the city or county.
7-1706. RECOVERY OF STATE MONEYS. After filing an action pursuant to
this chapter against a public entity that receives a general fund appropria-
tion or a distribution from general fund moneys, the attorney general shall
order that any such appropriation or distribution be withheld until the ac-
tion is resolved in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds
that the public entity failed to comply with the law, the withheld moneys
shall be retained in the general fund. If the court finds that the public
entity complied with the law, the appropriation or distribution of the with-
held moneys shall be reinstated.
7-1707. ALTERNATE COUNSEL. (1) A public officer, public employee, or
public entity that would otherwise be entitled to legal representation by
the office of the attorney general may retain other counsel if an action au-
thorized by this chapter is filed against such officer, employee, or entity.
(2) Any alternate counsel employed by a public entity shall be compen-
sated with funds from the entity's appropriation.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.